Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.150

Council—Eligibility.

Only a qualified elector of the city or town may be a member of the council and upon ceasing to be such, or upon being convicted of a crime involving moral turpitude, or of violating the provisions of RCW 35.18.110, he or she shall immediately forfeit his or her office.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2028; 1965 c 7 s 35.18.150. Prior: 1955 c 337 s 15; prior: (i) 1943 c 271 s 19, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-28, part. (ii) 1943 c 271 s 9, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-18, part.]